District of Columbia statutes.
2-360.06

Oaths, discovery, and subpoena power.

(a)

A member of the Board may administer oaths to witnesses, authorize depositions and discovery proceedings, and require by subpoena the attendance of witnesses and production of books and papers for the taking of testimony or evidence by deposition or in the hearing of an appeal by the Board.

(b)

If any witness, having been personally served with a subpoena, shall neglect or refuse to obey the subpoena issued, on written application, the Board may report the fact of the neglect or refusal to a judge of the Superior Court for the District of Columbia who may compel obedience to the subpoena.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1006, 58 DCR 1185
2001 Ed., § 2-309.06.